Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.180

Application—Relation to other laws.

The provisions of this act are supplemental to, and do not derogate from, any other statutory or common law proceedings, theories, or remedies including, but not limited to, the common law allocation of the burden of proof or production among the parties.

[ 2009 c 525 s 21.]